Maryland, session 2026, HB1584.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
TITLE 10A. DELIVERY NETWORK SERVICES.
10A–101.
(A) IN THIS TITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1584*

HOUSE BILL 1584
(B) “DELIVERY NETWORK COMPANY” MEANS A COMPANY THAT OPERATES
IN THE STATE USING A DIGITAL NETWORK TO FACILITATE DELIVERY NETWORK
SERVICES WITHIN THE STATE ON AN ON–DEMAND BASIS.
(C) “DELIVERY NETWORK OPERATOR” OR “OPERATOR” MEANS AN
INDIVIDUAL WHO:
(1) HAS BEEN ISSUED A DELIVERY NETWORK OPERATOR’S LICENSE
OR IS OTHERWISE AUTHORIZED BY THE COMMISSION TO PROVIDE DELIVERY
NETWORK SERVICES;
(2) RECEIVES, THROUGH A DELIVERY NETWORK COMPANY’S DIGITAL
NETWORK APPLICATION OR PLATFORM, A CONNECTION TO A POTENTIAL CUSTOMER
TO FULFILL A REQUEST FOR DELIVERY NETWORK SERVICES IN EXCHANGE FOR THE
PAYMENT OF A FEE TO THE DELIVERY NETWORK COMPANY; AND
(3) USES A MOTOR VEHICLE THAT IS OWNED, LEASED, OR OTHERWISE
AUTHORIZED FOR USE BY THE INDIVIDUAL AND IS APPROVED FOR USE IN
PROVIDING DELIVERY NETWORK SERVICES BY THE COMMISSION.
(D) “DELIVERY NETWORK SERVICES” MEANS AN OPERATOR’S COLLECTION
AND DELIVERY OF ITEMS TO A CUSTOMER FOR ITEMS THAT:
(1) ARE REQUESTED BY A CUSTOMER THROUGH A DELIVERY
NETWORK COMPANY’S DIGITAL NETWORK; AND
(2) THE COLLECTION AND DELIVERY OF WHICH ARE FACILITATED BY
A DELIVERY NETWORK COMPANY.
(E) “ON–DEMAND BASIS” MEANS A DELIVERY NETWORK OPERATOR IS
PROVIDED WITH THE OPPORTUNITY TO ACCEPT OR REJECT A REQUEST FOR
DELIVERY NETWORK SERVICES.
10A–102.
THIS TITLE APPLIES TO DELIVERY NETWORK COMPANIES, OPERATORS, AND
DELIVERY NETWORK SERVICES.
10A–103.
(A) THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO ENSURE THAT
DELIVERY NETWORK COMPANIES AND OPERATORS ARE MAKING REASONABLE

HOUSE BILL 1584 3
EFFORTS TO MAKE DELIVERY NETWORK SERVICES ACCESSIBLE TO ALL PEOPLE,
INCLUDING INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES.
(B) THE REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE COMMISSION UNDER SUBSECTION
(A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL PROVIDE FOR:
(1) THE ACCESSIBILITY OF WEBSITES AND MOBILE APPLICATIONS
USED TO PROVIDE DELIVERY NETWORK SERVICES;
(2) THE REASONABLE ACCOMMODATIONS NECESSARY TO SERVE
INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES; AND
(3) THE PROVISION OF INFORMATION TO AN OPERATOR BY A
DELIVERY NETWORK COMPANY RELATED TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF FEDERAL AND
STATE LAWS RELATED TO ANTIDISCRIMINATION.
10A–104.
A DELIVERY NETWORK COMPANY MAY NOT OPERATE IN THE STATE UNLESS
THE COMMISSION HAS ISSUED A PERMIT TO THE DELIVERY NETWORK COMPANY.
10A–105.
(A) AN OPERATOR MAY NOT PROVIDE DELIVERY NETWORK SERVICES
UNLESS THE COMMISSION HAS AUTHORIZED THE OPERATOR TO OPERATE ON A
PROVISIONAL BASIS OR HAS ISSUED A VALID TEMPORARY OR PERMANENT DELIVERY
NETWORK OPERATOR’S LICENSE TO PROVIDE DELIVERY NETWORK SERVICES.
(B) THE COMMISSION MAY APPROVE AN APPLICANT TO BE AN OPERATOR
AND ISSUE A TEMPORARY DELIVERY NETWORK OPERATOR’S LICENSE TO THE
APPLICANT IF:
(1) THE APPLICANT PROVIDES ALL INFORMATION THAT THE
COMMISSION REQUIRES FOR THE APPLICATION, INCLUDING THE INFORMATION
SPECIFIED IN ITEM (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(2) THE COMMISSION IS SATISFIED WITH THE SUCCESSFUL
SUBMISSION OF THE APPLICANT’S:
(I) NATIONAL CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK:

HOUSE BILL 1584
1. CONDUCTED BY A CONSUMER REPORTING AGENCY AS
DEFINED UNDER § 14–1201 OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE OR A COMPARABLE
ENTITY APPROVED BY THE COMMISSION; AND
2. THAT INCLUDES:
A. A MULTI–STATE MULTI–JURISDICTION CRIMINAL
RECORDS DATABASE SEARCH OR A SEARCH OF A SIMILAR NATIONWIDE DATABASE
WITH VALIDATION;
B. A SEARCH OF THE SEX OFFENDER REGISTRY; AND
C. A SEARCH OF THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF JUSTICE’S
NATIONAL SEX OFFENDER PUBLIC WEBSITE; AND
(II) DRIVING RECORD CHECK THAT INCLUDES A DRIVING
HISTORY RESEARCH REPORT.
(C) A DELIVERY NETWORK COMPANY MAY SUBMIT THE INFORMATION
UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION ON BEHALF OF AN OPERATOR.
(D) THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT PROVIDE A
PROCESS THAT IS AS EXPEDITIOUS AS POSSIBLE AND USES ELECTRONIC MEANS FOR:
(1) THE SUBMISSION OF THE INFORMATION UNDER SUBSECTION (B)
OF THIS SECTION;
(2) THE ISSUANCE OF A TEMPORARY OR PERMANENT DELIVERY
NETWORK OPERATOR’S LICENSE AND ALTERNATIVE AUTHORITY TO OPERATE ON A
PROVISIONAL BASIS; AND
(3) THE RENEWAL OF A DELIVERY NETWORK OPERATOR’S LICENSE.
(E) (1) RECORDS OR INFORMATION PROVIDED TO THE COMMISSION BY A
DELIVERY NETWORK COMPANY UNDER THIS SECTION OR DISCLOSED BY THE
COMMISSION UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION ARE NOT SUBJECT TO
RELEASE UNDER THE PUBLIC INFORMATION ACT.
(2) THE COMMISSION MAY NOT DISCLOSE RECORDS OR
INFORMATION PROVIDED TO THE COMMISSION UNDER THIS SECTION TO ANY
PERSON UNLESS:

HOUSE BILL 1584 5
(I) THE DISCLOSURE IS REQUIRED BY COURT ORDER OR ORDER
OF THE MARYLAND TAX COURT; OR
(II) THE DISCLOSURE IS MADE IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 10–119.3
OF THE FAMILY LAW ARTICLE.
(3) ON NOTICE THAT A PERSON IS SEEKING RECORDS OR
INFORMATION UNDER PARAGRAPH (2)(I) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE COMMISSION
PROMPTLY SHALL NOTIFY THE DELIVERY NETWORK COMPANY BEFORE DISCLOSING
THE RECORDS OR INFORMATION.
10A–106.
(A) A DELIVERY NETWORK COMPANY’S DIGITAL NETWORK APPLICATION OR
PLATFORM SHALL ILLUSTRATE FOR EACH OPERATOR, BEFORE ACCEPTING OR
REJECTING A REQUEST FOR DELIVERY NETWORK SERVICES:
(1) THE ESTIMATED DISTANCE AND TIME ASSOCIATED WITH THE
DELIVERY NETWORK SERVICE;
(2) THE MINIMUM GUARANTEED PAY, EXCLUDING GRATUITIES OR
TIPS; AND
(3) INFORMATION ON HOW GRATUITIES OR TIPS MAY BE MODIFIED
AFTER COMPLETION OF THE DELIVERY NETWORK SERVICE.
(B) A DELIVERY NETWORK COMPANY MAY NOT REQUIRE AN OPERATOR TO
ACCEPT A SPECIFIC DELIVERY REQUEST AS A CONDITION OF MAINTAINING ACCESS
TO THE DELIVERY NETWORK COMPANY’S DIGITAL NETWORK.
10A–107.
(A) ALL GRATUITIES AND TIPS EARNED BY AN OPERATOR FOR DELIVERY
NETWORK SERVICES SHALL BE PROVIDED TO THE OPERATOR IN FULL AND
SEPARATELY ITEMIZED.
(B) A DELIVERY NETWORK COMPANY MAY NOT REDUCE IN ANY WAY AN
OPERATOR’S PAY IN RESPONSE TO GRATUITIES OR TIPS EARNED BY THE OPERATOR.
10A–108.
(A) A DELIVERY NETWORK COMPANY SHALL PROVIDE EACH CUSTOMER
AND OPERATOR A DIGITAL RECEIPT FOR EACH DELIVERY NETWORK SERVICE THAT

HOUSE BILL 1584
INCLUDES THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION IN PLAIN LANGUAGE AND IN A FORMAT
THAT ALLOWS A PERSON TO EASILY UNDERSTAND HOW OPERATOR COMPENSATION
WAS CALCULATED:
(1) THE TOTAL CUSTOMER PAYMENT;
(2) AN ITEMIZED LIST OF ALL CHARGES AND FEES PAID BY THE
CUSTOMER;
(3) THE TOTAL OPERATOR COMPENSATION, INCLUDING A
BREAKDOWN OF THE OPERATOR’S:
(I) BASE PAY;
(II) INCENTIVES AND BONUSES; AND
(III) GRATUITIES AND TIPS;
(4) THE AMOUNT RETAINED BY THE DELIVERY NETWORK COMPANY;
AND
(5) THE TOTAL TIME AND DISTANCE ASSOCIATED WITH THE DELIVERY
NETWORK SERVICE.
(B) A DELIVERY NETWORK COMPANY SHALL PROVIDE EACH OPERATOR
WITH A WEEKLY PAYMENT AND EARNINGS SUMMARY THAT INCLUDES:
(1) THE TOTAL PAYMENTS COLLECTED BY THE DELIVERY NETWORK
COMPANY FOR THE DELIVERY NETWORK SERVICES PROVIDED BY THE COMPANY’S
OPERATORS IN A GIVEN WEEK;
(2) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF ANY ADDITIONAL FEES THAT WERE
CHARGED TO CUSTOMERS BY THE DELIVERY NETWORK COMPANY FOR THE
DELIVERY NETWORK SERVICES PROVIDED BY THE COMPANY’S OPERATORS IN A
GIVEN WEEK;
(3) THE TOTAL AMOUNT THE OPERATOR EARNED THAT WEEK,
INCLUDING:
(I) BASE PAY;
(II) INCENTIVES AND BONUSES; AND

HOUSE BILL 1584 7
(III) GRATUITIES AND TIPS;
(4) THE TOTAL AMOUNT THE OPERATOR EARNED FROM THE TOTAL
PAYMENTS COLLECTED THAT WEEK, EXPRESSED AS A PERCENTAGE OF THE TOTAL
PAYMENTS COLLECTED;
(5) THE TOTAL AMOUNT THE OPERATOR EARNED FROM THE
ADDITIONAL FEES SPECIFIED IN ITEM (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION THAT WERE
COLLECTED THAT WEEK, EXPRESSED AS A PERCENTAGE OF THE TOTAL ADDITIONAL
FEES CHARGED;
(6) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF ANY PAYMENTS OR FEES RETAINED BY
THE DELIVERY NETWORK COMPANY;
(7) THE TOTAL TIME SPENT AND MILES TRAVELED BY THE OPERATOR
ON DELIVERY NETWORK SERVICES THAT WEEK; AND
(8) ANY ADDITIONAL INFORMATION THE DELIVERY NETWORK
COMPANY CONSIDERS APPROPRIATE.
10A–109.
(A) ON OR BEFORE FEBRUARY 1 EACH YEAR, A DELIVERY NETWORK
COMPANY SHALL REPORT TO THE COMMISSION THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION IN
AN AGGREGATED FORMAT FOR THE STATE AND BY COUNTY FOR THE PRIOR YEAR:
(1) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF OPERATORS;
(2) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF CUSTOMER PAYMENTS;
(3) THE TOTAL MILES AND TIME DRIVEN BY OPERATORS WHILE
PROVIDING IN–STATE DELIVERY NETWORK SERVICES FOR THE DELIVERY NETWORK
COMPANY;
(4) THE TOTAL AMOUNT EARNED BY OPERATORS FOR PROVIDING
IN–STATE DELIVERY NETWORK SERVICES FOR THE DELIVERY NETWORK COMPANY;
(5) THE AVERAGE AND MEDIAN OPERATOR COMPENSATION PER
HOUR OF DELIVERY NETWORK SERVICES; AND
(6) THE AVERAGE OPERATOR SHARE OF CUSTOMER PAYMENTS
EXPRESSED AS A PERCENTAGE.

HOUSE BILL 1584
(B) ANY INFORMATION OBTAINED BY THE COMMISSION UNDER THIS
SECTION THAT IS NOT OTHERWISE PUBLICLY AVAILABLE:
(1) IS CONSIDERED:
(I) A TRADE SECRET; AND
(II) CONFIDENTIAL AND PROPRIETARY INFORMATION; AND
(2) IS NOT SUBJECT TO DISCLOSURE UNDER THE PUBLIC
INFORMATION ACT.
(C) THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION MAY
BE MADE AVAILABLE TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON REQUEST, PROVIDED THAT
THE REPORT REMAIN CONFIDENTIAL AND EXEMPT FROM PUBLIC DISCLOSURE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.